Texas, session 891, HB241.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF TEXAS: SECTION 1.  Subchapter F, Chapter 86, Natural Resources Code, is amended by adding Section 86.186 to read as follows: Sec. 86.186.  ELIMINATION OF ROUTINE FLARING. (a) The commission by rule shall establish a policy to eliminate before December 31, 2031, the routine flaring of gas from wells or other facilities regulated by the commission. (b)  The policy may include: (1)  regulatory, incentive-based, or voluntary approaches for achieving the goals of the policy; and (2)  interim goals for individual wells or other facilities or for operators of wells or other facilities. (c)  Except as provided by Subsection (d), the policy must allow flaring for safety or emergency purposes or purposes authorized under Section 86.185. (d)  The policy may not allow flaring to be conducted for an extended period for a purpose that is not related to safety or an emergency. SECTION 2.  This Act takes effect on the 91st day after the last day of the legislative session.